District of Columbia statutes.
31-2502.25

Premiums of mutual companies.

The maximum premium shall be expressed in the policy of a mutual company, and it may be solely a cash premium, or may be a cash premium and an additional contingent premium, which contingent premium shall be not less than the cash premium, but no mutual company, except as otherwise provided in § 31-2502.14, shall issue any policy for a cash premium without an additional contingent premium until and unless it possesses a surplus of not less than $600,000.

History

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1076, ch. 792, ch. II, § 25
Aug. 14, 1973, 87 Stat. 305, Pub. L. 93-89, title IV, § 401

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-2502.14.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1529.
1973 Ed., § 35-1329.